District of Columbia statutes.
31-5513

Recognition of assessments in rates.

The rates and premiums charged for insurance policies to which this chapter applies shall include amounts sufficient to recoup a sum equal to the amounts paid to the Association by the member insurer less any amounts returned to the member insurer by the Association, and these rates shall not be deemed excessive because they contain an amount reasonably calculated to recoup assessments paid by the member insurer.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-51, § 14, 40 DCR 6120

History

1981 Ed., § 35-3913.

Prior Codifications